Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,101.05
Mixed waste; requirements.

Waste which is defined by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission or the federal Environmental Protection Agency as mixed waste shall be solidified, neutralized, and stabilized to the maximum degree practicable prior to shipment to the facility. Mixed waste which has not been treated to the degree required by this section shall not be disposed of at the facility.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 10.